Massachusetts, session 194th, H4363.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with Massachusetts Bay Community College,
may convey to Kimberlee A. Dow, or her successors or assigns, of 23 Oakland circle in the town
of Wellesley, a certain parcel of land, which is a portion of the land described in a deed recorded
with the Norfolk registry of deeds in book 4990, page 254, located in the town of Wellesley,
which is currently used for community college purposes under the care and control of
Massachusetts Bay Community College. The parcel contains 3,500 square feet more or less and
is identified as “Gravel Driveway” on a draft plan on file with the division of capital asset
management and maintenance entitled, “Plan of Land 23 Oakland Circle Wellesley, Norfolk
County, Massachusetts”, dated May 7, 2024, prepared by Anderson Surveys, Inc.; provided,
of 3

however, that the boundaries of the parcel shall be determined by the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance. The conveyance shall be without representations or
warranties and shall be subject to any additional terms and conditions as the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance may deem necessary.
SECTION 2. Consideration for the conveyance of the parcel authorized in section 1 shall
be the fair market value of the parcel or the value in proposed use of the parcel, whichever is
greater, as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance based
upon an independent appraisal of the fair market value and value in use of the parcel, which shall
be prepared in accordance with the usual and customary professional appraisal practices by a
qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance. The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall submit the
appraisal or appraisals to the inspector general for their review and comment. The inspector
general shall review and approve the appraisal, and the review shall include an examination of
the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a report of their
review and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance
for submission by said commissioner to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight. Said commissioner
shall submit copies of the appraisals, and the inspector general’s review and approval and
comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on state administration and regulatory oversight at least 15 days prior to the execution
of documents effecting the transfer described in section 1.
of 3

SECTION 3. The proceeds realized from the conveyance authorized in section 1 shall be
deposited in the Massachusetts Bay Community College Oakland Circle Scholarship trust
established in section 5.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Kimberlee A.
Dow or her successors or assigns shall be responsible for all costs and expenses of any
transaction authorized by this act as determined by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, including, but not limited to, the costs of any engineering,
surveys, appraisals, title examinations, recording fees and deed preparation.
SECTION 5. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth
an expendable trust account known as the Massachusetts Bay Community College Oakland
Circle Scholarship trust, which shall be administered by the president of Massachusetts Bay
Community College. The trust shall be credited with: (i) the proceeds realized from the
conveyance authorized in section 1; (ii) any appropriation, grant, gift or other contribution made
to the fund; and (iii) any interest earned on money in the fund.
(b) Amounts credited to the trust shall be expended, without further appropriation, for
student scholarships. The unexpended balance in the trust at the end of a fiscal year shall remain
available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the trust shall
cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.
of 3